fst/morphology/phonology/phonology.xfscript
! 10. Vowel shortening V: > V / _ + V

define ii2iRule [ [i i] -> i || _ Bx Vowel ,, [í í] -> í || _ Bx Vowel ] ;
define aa2aRule [ [a a] -> a || _ Bx Vowel ,, [á á] -> á || _ Bx Vowel ] ;
define oo2oRule [ [o o] -> o || _ Bx Vowel ,, [ó ó] -> ó || _ Bx Vowel ] ;
define VV2VRule [ ii2iRule .o. aa2aRule .o. oo2oRule ] ;

!  [í i] -> í || _ Bx Vowel ,,
!  [á a] -> á || _ Bx Vowel ,,
!  [ó o] -> ó || _ Bx Vowel ,,

!!€ áyo'kaa>o'pa
!!€ áyo'kao'pa

!!€ pookáá>iksi
!!€ pookáíksi

! 11. i-Loss i > 0 / Vy _ {a,o})

define iLossRule [ Ix -> 0 || Vowel (Bx) y _ (Bx) [ a | [a a] | o | [o o] ] ] ;

!!€ áyo'kaa>yi>aawa
!!€ áyo'kaayaawa

! 12. i-Absorption i > 0 / s _ {a,o})

define iAbsorbRule [ Ix -> 0 || s (Bx) _ Bx [ a | [a a] | o | [o o] ] ] ;

!!€ áókska'si>o'pa
!!€ áókska'so'pa

!!€ nit<i2oyi
!!€ nitsoyi

! 19. t-Affrication t > ts / _ i

define tAffricRule [ t -> t s || _ Bx [ i | i2 ] ] ;
!define rmi2 [ i2 -> i ] ;

!!€ nit<it<itsiniki
!!€ nitsitsitsiniki

!!€ nit<i2oyi
!!€ nitsoyi

! 13. ih-Loss ih > 0 / s _ s

define ihLossRule [ i (Bx) h -> 0 || s (Bx) _ (Bx) s ] ;

!!€ otokska'si>hsi
!!€ otokska'ssi

! 14. Presibilation ihs > ss, iihs > iss

define ihs2ssRule [ i (Bx) h (Bx) s -> s s ] ;
define iihs2issRule [ [i i] (Bx) h (Bx) s -> i s s ] ;
define PresibRule [ ihs2ssRule .o. iihs2issRule ] ;

!!€ otá'po'taki>hsi 
!!€ otá'po'takssi

!!€ pii<hsini
!!€ pissini

! 15. Semivowel loss G > 0 / {#,C} _ (C not ')

define WeakGlide [ Gx -> 0 || [ k | m | n | n2 | p | s | t | m2 | s2 ] (Bx) _ ] ;
define GlideInitial [ Gx -> 0 || .#. _ ] ;
define GlideLossRule [ WeakGlide .o. GlideInitial ] ;

!!€ yaatóót
!!€ aatóót

!!€ waaníít
!!€ aaníít

!!€ w<óko'si
!!€ óko'si

! does not apply
!!€ kikáta'<waaniihpa
!!€ kikáta'waaniihpa

! 16. Semivowel reduction G > 0 / _ + G

define GlideReductRule [ Gx -> 0 ||  _ (Bx) Gx ] ;

!!€ kitanistawawaaw>yináyi
!!€ kitanistawawaayináyi

! 1'. y-Reduction iyi > ii / C _ y

define iyiReductRule [ i y i -> [i i] || Consonant (Bx) _ (Bx) y ] ;

!!€ áíhpiyi>yináyi
!!€ áíhpiiyináyi

! 18. Post-sibilation ih > s / s _

define PostsibRule [ i (Bx) h -> s || s (Bx) _ ] ;

!!€ nitáókska'si>hpinnan
!!€ nitáókska'sspinnan

! 20. Glottal metathesis 'V > V' / V _ C

!define GlotMetaRule [ ' Bx o -> o ' || Vowel _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< a -> %< a ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< i -> %< i ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< o -> %< o ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< [o o] -> %< [o o] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< [a a] -> %< [a a] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
!' %< [i i] -> %< [i i] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ] ;

define GlotMetaRule [ ' %< a -> %< a ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< i -> %< i ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< i2 -> %< i2 ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< o -> %< o ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [o o] -> %< [o o] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [a a] -> %< [a a] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [i i] -> %< [i i] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,,
' %< a -> %> a ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< i -> %> i ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< i2 -> %> i2 ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< o -> %> o ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [o o] -> %> [o o] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [a a] -> %> [a a] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ,, 
' %< [i i] -> %> [i i] ' || Vowel (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ] ;

!!€ á'<omai'takiwa 
!!€ áó'mai'takiwa

!!€ káta'<sspitaawa
!!€ kátai'sspitaawa

! 21. Glottal loss ' > 0 / V V: _ C 

define GlotLossRule [ ' -> 0 || Vshort Bx Vlong (Bx) _ (Bx) Consonant ] ;

!!€ káta'<ookaawaatsi
!!€ kátaookaawaatsi

! 22. Glottal assimilation V' > V: / _ (s) C: (C not s) #expand (for all cons (why Clong does not work?))

!define GlotAssRule [ a ' -> [ a a ] || _ (Bx) (s) (Bx) [ Clong - [ s s ] ] ,, i ' -> [ i i ] || _ (Bx) (s) (Bx) [ Clong - [ s s ] ] ,, o ' -> [ o o ] || _ (Bx) (s) (Bx) [ Clong - [ s s ] ] ] ;

!define GlotAssRule [ ' -> a || a _ (s) [ Clong - [ s s ] ] ,, ' -> i || i _ (s) [ Clong - [ s s ] ] ,, ' -> o || Bx o _ Clong ] ;

define Glot2aRule [ a ' -> a a || _ (s) t t ] ;
define Glot2oRule [ o ' -> o o || _ (s) t t ] ;
define GlotAssRule [Glot2aRule .o. Glot2oRule ] ;

!!€ káta'<ottakiwaatsi
!!€ kátaoottakiwaatsi

!!€ á'<isttohkohpiy'ssi
!!€ áísttohkohpiy'ssi

! 23. Glottal reduction ' > 0 / _  

define GlotReductRule [ ' -> 0 || _ (Bx) ' ] ;

!!€ á'<o'tooyiniki
!!€ áó'tooyiniki

! 24. Vowel epenthesis 0 > V / V ' _ h  

define aEpenRule [ a ' h -> a ' a h ,, a a ' h -> a a ' a a h ] ;
define iEpenRule [ i ' h -> i ' i h ,, i i ' h -> i i ' i i h ] ;
define oEpenRule [ o ' h -> o ' o h ,, o o ' h -> o o ' o o h ] ;
define VowelEpenRule [ aEpenRule .o. iEpenRule .o. oEpenRule ] ;

!!€ káta'<ohto'toowa
!!€ kátao'ohto'toowa

! 25. sss-Shortening sss > ss  

define sss2ssRule [ [ s (Bx) s s | s s (Bx) s ] -> s s || _ Consonant ] ;

!!€ nit<ssksinoawa
!!€ nitssksinoawa

! 26. Accent spread V > +accent / V+accent + _

define aAccentRule [ a -> á || Vacc Bx _ ,, [ a a ] -> [ á a ] || Vacc Bx _ ] ;
define iAccentRule [ i -> í || Vacc Bx _ ,, [ i i ] -> [ í i ] || Vacc Bx _ ] ;
define oAccentRule [ o -> ó || Vacc Bx _ ,, [ o o ] -> [ ó o ] || Vacc Bx _ ] ;
define AccentRule [ aAccentRule .o. iAccentRule .o. oAccentRule ] ;

!!€ á<okska'siwa
!!€ áókska'siwa

!!€ atsikí>istsi
!!€ atsikíístsi

! 8. I-neutralization I > i

define i2NeutRule [ i3 -> i ,, i2 -> i ,, í2 -> í ] ; 

define deep2surfRule [ n2 -> n ,, a2 -> a ,, o2 -> o ,, a3 -> a ,, a4 -> a ,, s2 -> s ,, m2 -> m ] ; 

! define deep2surfRule [ Bx -> 0 ,, n2 -> n ,, a2 -> a ,, o2 -> o ,, a3 -> a ,, a4 -> a ,, s2 -> s ,, m2 -> m ] ; 

!define relax [ a (->) á, i (->) í, o (->) ó, á (->) a, í (->) i, ó (->) o ] ;  

! Dominik made some extra rules to make it work with the morphosyntax model

! define DelNasal [ m -> 0 || _ Consonant ] ;

read regex [ rmAccent
.o. y2iRule
.o. y22yRule
.o. shortPrefix
.o. rmSP
.o. weakm
.o. wyVarRule
.o. Demwa20Rule
.o. DemPli20Rule
.o. Demtrigger20
.o. Invo20Rule
.o. Invo2ooRule
.o. VLVsuffixRule
.o. IMPsuffixRule
.o. IMPit2istRule
.o. ICpastRule
.o. ICimpRule
.o. ICpastii20
.o. a20ProRule
.o. i20ProRule
.o. Invtrigger20
.o. 3MMsuffixRule
.o. 3MMtrigger20
.o. VLVtrigger20
.o. IMPtrigger20
.o. PROtrigger20
.o. ICtrigger20
.o. rcprRule
.o. rmRcpr
.o. bnfRule
.o. rmBnf
.o. sConnRuleB 
.o. sConnRuleA 
.o. Ck2kkRule
.o. imRule
.o. AIMtrigger20
.o. nonpermCRule
.o. pluralPossSuffixRule
.o. POSStrigger20
.o. oaawaRule
.o. pastPrefix
.o. h2ssRule 
.o. oReplaceRule
.o. wi2oRuleA1 
.o. wi2oRuleA2 
.o. wi2oRuleB1 
.o. wi2oRuleB2 
.o. imRule
.o. oaawaRule
.o. pastPrefix
.o. pastPrefixSik
.o. Dipthongization
.o. DIPHtrigger20
.o. moveDur
.o. k2ksRule
.o. iLossRule
.o. ihLossRule 
.o. PresibRule
.o. GlideReductRule 
.o. GlideLossRule
.o. tAffricRule 
.o. iAbsorbRule 
.o. Vowel2GlideRule
.o. VV2VRule 
.o. iaa2aaRule
.o. i2deletion
.o. iyiReductRule 
.o. PostsibRule 
.o. GlotMetaRule 
.o. GlotLossRule 
.o. GlotAssRule 
.o. GlotReductRule 
.o. VowelEpenRule
.o. sss2ssRule
.o. AccentRule 
.o. deep2surfRule
.o. sInsRule2
.o. i2NeutRule
] ;

!!!!! END !!!!!
